Utah statutes.
53B-14-103.   Failure to receive response or payment after notice -- Authority to collect balance.

If a written response or payment of delinquent installments is not received by the college, university, or board within 15 days from the date of receipt of the notice by the borrower, the college, university, or board may determine the balance due and proceed to collect the balance as provided in Section 53B-14-106.

